Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1771.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8340.13 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 8340.13. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Operating costs." The costs associated with an increase in the insurance premium of a policy used to cover attorney fees, court costs or other expenses of litigation.* * *Section 2. Sections 8340.16(f)(4) and 8340.18(a) of Title 123456789101112131415161718 42, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.836, No.72), are amended to read:§ 8340.16. Pretrial motion.* * *(f) Exceptions to stay.--During a stay under subsection (e), all of the following apply:* * *(4) A party may move to recover attorney fees, court costs [and], expenses of litigation and damages for present or future operating costs incurred by the party under section 8340.18 (relating to awards).§ 8340.18. Awards.(a) Party asserting immunity.--If a cause of action based on protected public expression is commenced against a party, all of the following apply:(1) If the party is immune under section 8340.15 (relating to grant of immunity), the court:(i) shall award the party attorney fees, court costs and expenses of litigation jointly and severally against each adverse party that asserted the cause of action[.]; and(ii) may award the party damages for present or future operating costs incurred by the party as a result of the cause of action jointly and severally against each adverse party that asserted the cause of action.(2) If the party asserts protected public expression immunity and the opposing party voluntarily discontinues the action under Pa.R.C.P. No. 230 (relating to voluntary nonsuit), with or without prejudice, the court:(i) shall award the asserting party attorney fees, court costs and expenses of litigation jointly and 20250HB1771PN2179 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 severally against each adverse party that asserted the cause of action[.]; and(ii) may award the asserting party damages for present or future operating costs incurred by the asserting party as a result of the cause of action jointly and severally against each adverse party that asserted the cause of action.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1771PN2179 - 3 - 123456789